New York, session 2025-2026, A7048.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 510 of the vehicle and traffic law 2 is amended by adding a new paragraph e to read as follows: 3 e. Suspension of license. The owner of a hazard vehicle service, as 4 defined in section one hundred seventeen-a of this chapter, or a service 5 involving operation for hire of any vehicle as a taxicab, livery or bus, 6 as such terms are defined in article one of this chapter, coach, limou- 7 sine, van or wheelchair accessible van, who has permitted an employee to 8 operate such vehicle when such employee has not been issued a valid 9 state driver license or whose license has been suspended or revoked 10 pursuant to this section, shall have such owner's business license 11 suspended for a period of thirty days by the commissioner or other 12 appropriate licensing authority. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09307-01-5